Illinois, session 104th, SB3115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Immigration Enforcement Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Immigration detainer is facially sufficient" means: (i) 8the federal immigration agency's official form is incomplete 9and fails to indicate on its face that the federal immigration 10official has probable cause to believe that the person to be 11detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law 12but is supported by an affidavit, order, or other official 13documentation that indicates that the federal immigration 14agency has probable cause to believe that the person to be 15detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law 16and the federal immigration agency supplies with its detention 17request a Form I-200 Warrant for Arrest of Alien, a Form I-205 18Warrant of Removal/Deportation, a successor warrant, or other 19warrant authorized by federal law; or (ii) the federal 20immigration agency's official form is complete and indicates 21on its face that the federal immigration official has probable 22cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable 23alien under federal immigration law.  SB3115- 2 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 2police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 3to make arrests, including local and State agencies.4    "Local entity" means a unit of local government, a school 5district, or a community college district.6    "State entity" means the State of Illinois and all of its 7agencies, State universities and colleges, and all corporate 8outgrowths of the State. 9    Section 10. Prohibited policies regarding immigration 10enforcement. A State entity, local entity, or law enforcement 11agency may not adopt or maintain a law, ordinance, resolution, 12rule, regulation, policy, directive, order, practice, or 13procedure, formal or informal, written or unwritten, that 14prohibits or materially restricts the State entity, local 15entity, or law enforcement agency from complying with or 16assisting in the enforcement of immigration laws. This 17includes prohibitions or restrictions on:18        (1) inquiries into the immigration status of any 19    person;20        (2) transmitting, requesting, or receiving information 21    relating to immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any 22    person to or from any federal immigration enforcement 23    agency;24        (3) maintaining, archiving, or otherwise storing for 25    subsequent use information relating to an individual's   SB3115- 3 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    immigration status;2        (4) exchanging information relating to immigration 3    status with another law enforcement agency, local entity, 4    State entity, or a federal immigration agency;5        (5) complying with an immigration detainer, including, 6    but not limited to, refusing to cooperate or comply with a 7    lawfully issued detainer in the absence of a warrant or 8    other order directing compliance with or enforcement of 9    such a detainer;10        (6) complying with a request from a federal 11    immigration agency to notify the agency before the release 12    of an inmate;13        (7) providing a federal immigration agency with an 14    inmate's incarceration status or release date;15        (8) assisting or cooperating with a federal 16    immigration agency, including by providing enforcement 17    assistance;18        (9) participating in any program or agreement 19    authorized under Section 287 of the federal Immigration 20    and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1357); or21        (10) permitting a federal immigration officer to enter 22    and conduct enforcement activities at a municipal jail, 23    county jail, or Division of Corrections or rehabilitation 24    facility involving or related to the enforcement of 25    federal immigration laws.   SB3115- 4 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    Section 15. Mandatory duties of law enforcement agencies 2regarding immigration detainers.3    (a) A law enforcement agency that takes initial custody of 4a person subject to an immigration detainer shall:5        (1) provide notice to the court authorized to grant or 6    deny the person's release on bail or bond that the person 7    is subject to an immigration detainer;8        (2) record in the person's case file that the person 9    is subject to an immigration detainer; and10        (3) upon determining that the immigration detainer is 11    facially sufficient, comply with the requests made in the 12    immigration detainer to the extent required by law.13    (b) A law enforcement agency is not required to perform a 14duty imposed by subsection (a) with respect to a person who has 15been transferred to the custody of the agency by another law 16enforcement agency subject to the requirements of this 17Section.18    (c) A court of competent jurisdiction that receives notice 19that a person is subject to an immigration detainer shall 20record this information in the court record, regardless of 21whether the notice is received before or after a judgment in 22the case. 23    Section 20. Mandatory agreements for housing persons 24subject to immigration detainers.25    (a) Each county jail, municipal jail, and the Department   SB3115- 5 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1of Corrections shall enter into an agreement with a federal 2immigration agency for temporarily housing persons who are the 3subject of immigration detainers and for the payment of the 4costs of housing and detaining those persons.5    (b) An agreement under this Section must include a 6contract with a federal immigration agency for housing or 7detaining persons subject to immigration detainers, such as 8basic ordering agreements, intergovernmental service 9agreements, agreements authorized by Section 287 of the 10federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1357), 11successor agreements, or other similar agreements authorized 12by federal law. 13    Section 25. Implementation; discrimination prohibited.14    (a) This Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent 15with federal laws and regulations governing immigration, 16protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the 17privileges and immunities of United States citizens.18    (b) A State entity, local entity, or law enforcement 19agency and a person employed by or otherwise under the 20direction or control of a State entity, local entity, or law 21enforcement agency may not base the entity's, agency's, or 22person's actions under this Act on the gender, race, color, 23religion, language, national origin, or physical disability of 24a person except to the extent authorized by the United States 25Constitution, the constitution and laws of this State, or   SB3115- 6 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1other applicable federal law. 2    Section 30. Home rule. The regulation of immigration 3enforcement is an exclusive power and function of the State. A 4home rule unit may not regulate immigration enforcement. This 5Act is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 6functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 7the Illinois Constitution. 8    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.37 rep.)9    Section 100. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 10amended by repealing Section 5-45.37. 11    (5 ILCS 805/Act rep.)12    Section 105. The Illinois TRUST Act is repealed. 13    Section 110. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 14amended by changing Section 11 as follows: 15    (15 ILCS 335/11)  (from Ch. 124, par. 31)16    Sec. 11. Records. 17    (a) The Secretary may make a search of his records and 18furnish information as to whether a person has a current 19Standard Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois Person 20with a Disability Identification Card then on file, upon 21receipt of a written application therefor accompanied with the   SB3115- 7 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1prescribed fee. However, the Secretary may not disclose 2medical information concerning an individual to any person, 3public agency, private agency, corporation or governmental 4body unless the individual has submitted a written request for 5the information or unless the individual has given prior 6written consent for the release of the information to a 7specific person or entity. This exception shall not apply to: 8(1) offices and employees of the Secretary who have a need to 9know the medical information in performance of their official 10duties, or (2) orders of a court of competent jurisdiction. 11When medical information is disclosed by the Secretary in 12accordance with the provisions of this Section, no liability 13shall rest with the Office of the Secretary of State as the 14information is released for informational purposes only.15    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 16Secretary may release personally identifying information only 17to:18        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 19    need to know that information for issuance of driver's 20    licenses, permits, or identification cards and 21    investigation of fraud or misconduct;22        (2) other governmental agencies for use in their 23    official governmental functions;24        (3) law enforcement agencies for a criminal or civil 25    investigation, except as restricted by subsections (g) and 26    (h);  SB3115- 8 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1        (3-5) the State Board of Elections as may be required 2    by an agreement the State Board of Elections has entered 3    into with a multi-state voter registration list 4    maintenance system; or5        (4) any entity that the Secretary has authorized, by 6    rule.7    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 8Secretary may release highly restricted personal information 9only to:10        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 11    need to access the information for the issuance of 12    driver's licenses, permits, or identification cards and 13    investigation of fraud or misconduct;14        (2) law enforcement officials for a criminal or civil 15    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 16    subsections (g) and (h);17        (3) the State Board of Elections for the purpose of 18    providing the signature for completion of voter 19    registration; or20        (4) any other entity the Secretary has authorized by 21    rule.22    (d) Documents required to be submitted with an application 23for an identification card to prove the applicant's identity 24(name and date of birth), social security number or lack of a 25social security number, written signature, residency, and, as 26applicable, citizenship and immigration status and country of   SB3115- 9 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1citizenship shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed 2except to the following persons:3        (1) the individual to whom the identification card was 4    issued, upon written request;5        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 6    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 7    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 8    permits, or identification cards and investigation of 9    fraud or misconduct;10        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 11    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 12    subsections (g) and (h);13        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 14    rule.15    (e) The Secretary may not disclose an individual's social 16security number or any associated information obtained from 17the Social Security Administration without the written request 18or consent of the individual except: (i) to officers and 19employees of the Secretary who have a need to know the social 20security number in the performance of their official duties; 21(ii) except as restricted by subsections (g) and (h) to law 22enforcement officials for a civil or criminal law enforcement 23investigation if an officer of the law enforcement agency has 24made a written request to the Secretary specifying the law 25enforcement investigation for which the social security number 26is being sought; (iii) under a lawful court order signed by a   SB3115- 10 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1judge; (iv) to the Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs for 2the purpose of confirming veteran status to agencies in other 3states responsible for the issuance of state identification 4cards for participation in State-to-State verification 5service; or (v) the last 4 digits to the Illinois State Board 6of Elections for purposes of voter registration and as may be 7required pursuant to an agreement for a multi-state voter 8registration list maintenance system. The Secretary retains 9the right to require additional verification regarding the 10validity of a request from law enforcement. If social security 11information is disclosed by the Secretary in accordance with 12this Section, no liability shall rest with the Office of the 13Secretary of State or any of its officers or employees, as the 14information is released for official purposes only. 15    (f) The Secretary of State shall not provide facial 16recognition search services or photographs obtained in the 17process of issuing an identification card to any federal, 18State, or local law enforcement agency or other governmental 19entity for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws. 20This subsection shall not apply to requests from federal, 21State, or local law enforcement agencies or other governmental 22entities for facial recognition search services or photographs 23obtained in the process of issuing a driver's license or 24permit when the purpose of the request relates to criminal 25activity other than violations of immigration laws. 26    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the   SB3115- 11 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1Secretary may not release highly restricted personal 2information or personally identifying information or disclose 3documents described in subsection (d) to any immigration 4agent, as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 5unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 6that production of such information or documents is 7specifically required:8        (1) a lawful court order;9        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 10    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 11    States; or12        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 13    federal or State court.14    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 15subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 16information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 17receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 18Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 19whom such information was requested that a court order, 20warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 21entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.22    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 23agent of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the 24U.S. Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or 25successor agency. 26    (h) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any   SB3115- 12 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 2personal information or personally identifying information or 3documents described in subsection (d) unless all other parties 4to such agreement certify that the information obtained will 5not be used for civil immigration purposes or knowingly 6disseminated to any third party for any purpose related to 7civil immigration enforcement. 8(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.) 9    Section 115. The Department of Human Services Act is 10amended by adding Section 1-92 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 1305/1-92 new)12    Sec. 1-92. Asylum Travel Expense Program.13    (a) As used in this Section, "noncitizen seeking asylum" 14means a noncitizen who wants to begin the process of seeking 15asylum through processes required by the United States 16Citizenship and Immigration Services or who has already begun 17or has completed the application process of requesting asylum 18required by the United States Citizenship and Immigration 19Services. 20    (b) The Asylum Travel Expense Program is created within 21the Department. The Program shall, subject to funding as 22provided in subsection (c) and future appropriation, provide 23noncitizens seeking asylum who are residing in Illinois 24transportation and travel expenses for travel to another state   SB3115- 13 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1that prohibits law enforcement or other governmental agencies 2from assisting the United States Immigration and Customs 3Enforcement or other federal government agency with 4immigration enforcement or to the country of origin of the 5noncitizen seeking asylum. The Department may provide for, 6using moneys from the Fund established under subsection (c), 7transportation and travel expenses to relocate the noncitizen 8seeking asylum to the state of choice of the noncitizen or the 9country of origin of the noncitizen as allowed under this 10subsection. The method of transportation selected by the 11Department shall be by the cheapest means to transport the 12noncitizen seeking asylum to the noncitizen's desired 13destination. The Department may adopt rules to implement the 14Program. 15    (c) On July 1, 2026, the State Comptroller shall direct 16and the State Treasurer shall transfer $10,000,000 from the 17General Revenue Fund into the Asylum Travel Expenses Fund, a 18special fund that is created in the State treasury, and may be 19expended by the Secretary of Human Services to provide 20transportation and travel expenses as provided in subsection 21(b).  22    Section 120. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 23Section 5.1038 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)  SB3115- 14 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    Sec. 5.1038. The Asylum Travel Expenses Fund. 2    Section 125. The School Code is amended by changing 3Section 22-105, as added by Public Act 104-288, as follows: 4    (105 ILCS 5/22-106)5    Sec. 22-106 22-105. Denial of free education prohibited. 6    (a) The purpose of this Section is to secure the right of 7every child to equal access to a free public education and a 8school that is safe from intimidation and fear, consistent 9with the landmark United States Supreme Court decision in 10Plyler v. Doe, 457 U.S. 202 (1982), as in effect on January 1, 112025, which held that it is unconstitutional for states to 12deny children a free public education based on immigration 13status. In their efforts to promote the right to educational 14equality established in Plyler, schools must take steps to 15protect the integrity of school learning environments for all 16children, so that no parent is discouraged from sending and no 17child is discouraged from attending school, including from the 18threat of immigration enforcement or other law enforcement 19activity on a school campus.20    (b) As used in this Section:21    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 22regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 23country or the authority or lack thereof to reside in or 24otherwise to be present in the United States, including an   SB3115- 15 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1individual's nationality and country of citizenship.2    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal, State, 3or local law enforcement authorized with the power to arrest 4or detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 5individuals for a law enforcement purpose, including civil 6immigration enforcement. "Law enforcement agent" does not 7include a school resource officer as defined in Section 810-20.68 of this Code. 9    "Nonjudicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a federal, 10State, or local agency authorized with the power to arrest or 11detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 12individuals for any law enforcement purpose, including civil 13immigration enforcement. "Nonjudicial warrant" includes an 14immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant as defined 15in the Illinois TRUST Act. "Nonjudicial warrant" does not 16include a criminal warrant issued upon a judicial 17determination of probable cause, in compliance with the 18requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the United States 19Constitution and Section 6 of Article I of the Illinois 20Constitution. 21    "Prevailing party" includes any party:22        (1) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 23    through a judicial judgment in his or her favor;24        (2) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 25    through a settlement agreement approved by the court; or26        (3) whose pursuit of a non-frivolous claim was a   SB3115- 16 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 2    opposing party relative to the relief sought.3    "School" means every public school, school district, and 4governing body, including a special charter district or 5charter school, organized under this Code, and its agents, 6including a contracted party.7    (c) No child may be denied a free public education through 8secondary school while in this State based on the child's 9perceived or actual immigration status or the child's parent's 10or guardian's perceived or actual citizenship or immigration 11status.12        (1) A school must not exclude a child from 13    participation in or deny a child the benefits of any 14    program or activity on the grounds of that child's 15    perceived or actual immigration status or the child's 16    parent's or guardian's actual or perceived citizenship or 17    immigration status.18        (2) A school must not use policies or procedures or 19    engage in practices that have the effect of excluding a 20    child from participation in or denying the benefits of any 21    program or activity or the effect of excluding 22    participation of the child's parent or guardian from 23    parental engagement activities or programs because of the 24    child's perceived or actual immigration status or the 25    child's parent's or guardian's actual or perceived 26    immigration status. These policies, procedures, and   SB3115- 17 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    practices include:2            (A) requesting or collecting information or 3        documentation from a student or the student's parent 4        or guardian about citizenship or immigration status 5        unless required by State or federal law; and6            (B) designating immigration status, citizenship, 7        place of birth, nationality, or national origin as 8        directory information, as that term is defined by 9        federal and State law.10        (3) A school must not perform any of the following 11    actions:12            (A) Threaten to disclose anything related to the 13        actual or perceived citizenship or immigration status 14        of a child or a person associated with the child to any 15        other person or entity or an immigration or law 16        enforcement agency.17            (B) Disclose anything related to the perceived 18        citizenship or immigration status of a child or a 19        person associated with the child to any other person 20        or entity or an immigration or law enforcement agency 21        if the school does not have direct knowledge of the 22        child's or associated person's actual citizenship or 23        immigration status, subject to the requirements of 24        this paragraph (3).25            (C) Disclose anything related to the actual 26        citizenship or immigration status of a child or a   SB3115- 18 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1        person associated with the child to any other person 2        or nongovernmental entity if the school has direct 3        knowledge of the child's or associated person's actual 4        citizenship or immigration status, subject to the 5        requirements of this paragraph (3).6        Nothing in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph 7    (3) may be construed to permit the disclosure of student 8    records or information without complying with State and 9    federal requirements governing the disclosure of such 10    records or information. Subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this 11    paragraph (3) may not be construed to prohibit or restrict 12    an entity from sending to or receiving from the United 13    States Department of Homeland Security or any other 14    federal, State, or local governmental entity information 15    regarding the citizenship or immigration status of an 16    individual under Sections 1373 and 1644 of Title 8 of the 17    United States Code.18        (4) A school must develop procedures for reviewing and 19    authorizing requests from law enforcement agents 20    attempting to enter a school or school facility by July 1, 21    2026. The procedures must comply with the requirements of 22    paragraph (2) of this subsection (c), and, at a minimum, 23    include the following:24            (A) procedures for reviewing and contacting a 25        designated authorized person at the school or school 26        facility and the district superintendent's office or   SB3115- 19 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1        school administrative office, who may contact the 2        school's legal counsel, and procedures for that 3        authorized person or legal counsel to review requests 4        to enter a school or school facility, including 5        judicial warrants, nonjudicial warrants, and 6        subpoenas;7            (B) procedures for monitoring or accompanying and 8        procedures for documenting all interactions with law 9        enforcement agents while on the school's premises; and10            (C) procedures for notifying and seeking consent 11        from a student's parents or guardian or from the 12        student if the student is 18 years old or older or 13        emancipated if a law enforcement agent requests access 14        to a student for immigration enforcement purposes, 15        unless such access is in compliance with a judicial 16        warrant or subpoena that restricts the disclosure of 17        the information to the student's parent or guardian.18        This paragraph (4) is subject to subsection (c) of 19    Section 22-88 of this Code.20    (d) A school shall adopt a policy for complying with 21paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (c) by July 1, 222026.23    (e) Beginning July 1, 2026, any party aggrieved by conduct 24that violates subsection (c) may bring a civil lawsuit. This 25lawsuit must be brought no later than 2 years after the 26violation of subsection (c). If the court finds that a willful   SB3115- 20 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (c) has 2occurred, the court may award actual damages. The court, as it 3deems appropriate, may grant, as relief, any permanent or 4preliminary negative or mandatory injunction, temporary 5restraining order, or other order.6    (f) Nothing in this Section may be construed to require an 7exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before 8civil law remedies may be pursued.9    (g) Upon a motion, a court shall award reasonable 10attorney's fees and costs, including expert witness fees and 11other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing 12party in any action brought under subsection (c). In awarding 13reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider the 14degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief 15sought.16    (h) The General Assembly finds and declares that this 17Section is a State law within the meaning of subsection (d) of 18Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.19(Source: P.A. 104-288, eff. 1-1-26; revised 10-27-25.) 20    Section 130. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 21changing Section 18 as follows: 22    (110 ILCS 167/18)23    Sec. 18. Immigration status and immigration enforcement. 24    (a) As used in this Section:  SB3115- 21 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 2regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 3country or the authority or lack thereof to reside in or 4otherwise to be present in the United States, including an 5individual's nationality, country of citizenship, or status as 6an international student.7    "Employee" means a full-time or part-time faculty member, 8staff member, executive leader, supervisor, clerical person, 9student, or contracted member of personnel employed by a 10school whose role involves direct, routine, or meaningful 11interaction with students to support their academic progress, 12personal development, or well-being. 13    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal, State, 14or local law enforcement authorized with the power to arrest 15or detain individuals, or manage the custody of detained 16individuals, for civil immigration enforcement. "Law 17enforcement agent" does not include an agent of a school's 18police department.19    "Nonjudicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a federal, 20State, or local governmental agency authorized with the power 21to arrest or detain individuals or manage the custody of 22detained individuals for any law enforcement purpose, 23including civil immigration enforcement. "Nonjudicial warrant" 24includes an immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant 25as defined in the Illinois TRUST Act. "Nonjudicial warrant" 26does not include a criminal warrant issued upon a judicial   SB3115- 22 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1determination of probable cause, in compliance with the 2requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the United States 3Constitution and Section 6 of Article I of the Illinois 4Constitution.5    "Prevailing party" includes any party:6        (1) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 7    through a judicial judgment in his or her favor;8        (2) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 9    through a settlement agreement approved by a court; or10        (3) whose pursuit of a nonfrivolous claim was a 11    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 12    opposing party relative to the relief sought. 13    "School" means a public institution of higher education as 14defined in Section 5.15    "School campus" or "school's campus" means:16        (1) any building or property owned or controlled by a 17    school within the same reasonably contiguous geographic 18    area of the school and used by the school in direct support 19    of or in a manner related to the school's educational 20    purposes, including, but not limited to, residence halls; 21    and22        (2) property within the same reasonably contiguous 23    geographic area of the school that is owned by the school 24    but controlled by another person, is used by students, and 25    supports school purposes, including, but not limited to, a 26    food or other retail vendor.   SB3115- 23 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    (b) Unless required by State or federal law or rule, a 2school must not perform any of the following actions:3        (1) Threaten to disclose the actual or perceived 4    citizenship or immigration status of an employee, a 5    student, or a person associated with an employee or 6    student to an external party, including immigration or law 7    enforcement agencies.8        (2) Knowingly disclose, without the consent of the 9    employee or student, anything related to the perceived 10    citizenship or immigration status of an employee, a 11    student, or a person associated with an employee or 12    student to an external party, including immigration or law 13    enforcement agencies, if the school does not have direct 14    knowledge of the employee's, student's, or associated 15    person's actual citizenship or immigration status, subject 16    to the requirements of this subsection.17        (3) Knowingly disclose, without the consent of the 18    employee or student, anything related to the actual 19    citizenship or immigration status of an employee, a 20    student, or a person associated with an employee or 21    student to any other person or nongovernmental entity if 22    the school has direct knowledge of the employee's, 23    student's, or associated person's actual citizenship or 24    immigration status, subject to the requirements of this 25    subsection.26        (4) Designate immigration status, citizenship, place   SB3115- 24 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    of birth, nationality, or national origin as directory 2    information, as that term is defined by State and federal 3    law.4    Nothing in this subsection may be construed to:5        (A) prohibit a school from complying with all 6    applicable State and federal laws and rules, including, 7    but not limited to, 8 U.S.C. 214;8        (B) prohibit or restrict a school from sending to or 9    receiving from the United States Department of Homeland 10    Security or any other federal, State, or local 11    governmental entity information regarding the citizenship 12    or immigration status of an individual under Sections 1373 13    and 1644 of Title 8 of the United States Code;14        (C) permit the disclosure of personally identifiable 15    education records, as that term is defined by State or 16    federal law, or information from those records without 17    complying with State and federal laws and rules governing 18    the disclosure of such records or information;19        (D) prohibit schools from complying with valid 20    judicial warrants, orders, or subpoenas; or21        (E) prohibit or restrict a school from disclosing 22    information necessary to respond to an administrative 23    complaint or litigation brought against or by the school.24    (c) A school must develop procedures for reviewing and 25authorizing requests from law enforcement agents attempting to 26enter a school's campus by January 1, 2026. The procedures   SB3115- 25 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1must, at a minimum, include the following:2        (1) procedures for reviewing and contacting a 3    designated authorized person, office, or department at the 4    school or school facility, which person, office, or 5    department may contact the school's legal counsel, and 6    procedures for that authorized person, office, or 7    department or legal counsel to review requests to enter a 8    school's campus, including judicial warrants or orders, 9    nonjudicial warrants, and subpoenas;10        (2) procedures for documenting all interactions with 11    law enforcement agents while on the school's campus; and12        (3) procedures for notifying and seeking consent from 13    an employee or student if a law enforcement agent requests 14    access to the employee or student for immigration 15    enforcement purposes, unless such consent is prohibited by 16    a judicial warrant or subpoena.17    (d) A school must provide information on its website about 18who employees and students should contact if a law enforcement 19agent seeks to enter the school campus, enters the school 20campus, or engages in nonconsensual interactions with members 21of the school community, including employees or students, by 22January 1, 2026.23    (e) A school shall submit to either the Illinois Community 24College Board or the Illinois Board of Higher Education, as 25applicable, a copy of the procedures developed to implement 26subsections (b) and (c). The Illinois Community College Board   SB3115- 26 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1and the Illinois Board of Higher Education shall submit to the 2General Assembly a report compiling the procedures received 3from each school under this subsection (e) by July 1, 2026.4    (f) The General Assembly finds and declares that this 5Section is a State law within the meaning of subsection (d) of 6Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.7    (g) By January 1, 2026, a school shall provide immigration 8enforcement resources on its website to help students and 9employees understand their constitutional rights and access 10immigration-related guidance. These resources may include, but 11are not limited to, a link to illinoisimmigrationinfo.org. 12This information shall be posted in a clear and easily 13accessible location on the school's primary website.14    (h) For the purposes of this subsection, "immigration 15enforcement activity" includes any arrests or detentions 16conducted by agents or officers of the United States 17Department of Homeland Security, United States Immigration and 18Customs Enforcement, or United States Customs and Border 19Protection or any other individual or entity with the power to 20arrest or detain individuals or manage custody of detained 21individuals for the purposes of civil immigration enforcement.22    By January 1, 2026, a school shall adopt procedures 23designed to:24        (1) determine if an immigration enforcement activity 25    is occurring or has occurred on the school's campus, 26    including verification of the first and last name,   SB3115- 27 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1    employer or agency, and badge number of the lead law 2    enforcement agent, if possible; and3        (2) notify the appropriate school-campus unit or area 4    if the school confirms that immigration enforcement 5    activity is occurring or has occurred on the school's 6    campus that, in the judgment of school law enforcement or 7    the school's public safety office, could adversely impact 8    school-campus safety or operations.9    (i) A school may not impede students or employees from 10offering, attending, or participating in training on 11constitutional rights and immigration-related guidance, 12including, but not limited to, attending know-your-rights 13training or sharing know-your-rights flyers.14    (j) Beginning January 1, 2026, any party aggrieved by 15conduct that violates subsection (b) may bring a civil 16lawsuit. This lawsuit must be brought no later than 2 years 17after the violation of subsection (b) or 2 years from the date 18the aggrieved party becomes aware of the violation of 19subsection (b), whichever is later. If the court finds that a 20willful violation of subsection (b) has occurred, the court 21may award actual damages. The court, as it deems appropriate, 22may grant, as relief, a permanent or preliminary negative or 23mandatory injunction, temporary restraining order, or other 24order.25    (k) Nothing in this Section may be construed to require an 26exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before   SB3115- 28 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1civil law remedies may be pursued.2    (l) Upon a motion, a court shall award reasonable 3attorney's fees and costs, including expert witness fees and 4other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing 5party in any action brought under subsection (i). In awarding 6reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider the 7degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief 8sought. 9(Source: P.A. 104-440, eff. 12-9-25.) 10    (305 ILCS 5/12-4.35 rep.)11    Section 135. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 12repealing Section 12-4.35. 13    Section 140. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 14changing Section 6-110.3 as follows: 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.3)16    Sec. 6-110.3. Restrictions on use of information for 17certain purposes.18    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 19Secretary may not release or make accessible in any manner any 20highly restricted personal information as defined in Section 211-125.9 or personally identifying information as defined in 22Section 1-159.2, provide images, photos, or facial recognition 23services as described in Section 6-110.1, or disclose   SB3115- 29 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1documents as described in Section 6-110.2 to any immigration 2agent as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 3unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 4that production of such information or documents is 5specifically required:6        (1) a lawful court order;7        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 8    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 9    States; or10        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 11    federal or State court.12    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 13subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 14information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 15receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 16Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 17whom such information was requested that a court order, 18warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 19entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.20    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 21agent of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the 22U.S. Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or 23successor agency. 24    (b) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any 25agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 26personal information as defined in Section 1-125.9, personally   SB3115- 30 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1identifying information as defined in Section 1-159.2, images 2or photos described in Section 6-110.1, or documents described 3in Section 6-110.2 unless all other parties to such agreement 4certify that the information obtained will not be used for 5civil immigration purposes or knowingly disseminated to any 6third party for any purpose related to civil immigration 7enforcement. 8(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.  SB3115- 31 -LRB104 18867 RLC 32312 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    5 ILCS 100/5-45.37 rep.5    5 ILCS 805/Act rep.6    15 ILCS 335/11from Ch. 124, par. 317    20 ILCS 1305/1-92 new8    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new9    105 ILCS 5/22-10610    110 ILCS 167/1811    305 ILCS 5/12-4.35 rep.12    625 ILCS 5/6-110.3